Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.090

Preemptive share acquisition rights.

The preemptive right of a shareholder to acquire unissued shares of a corporation may be limited or denied to the extent provided in the articles of incorporation.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 18.]